Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5489.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 20950a. An individual issued a licensed under section 20950(2) shall meet 1 of the following requirements: (a) Subject to the youth employment standards act, 1978 PA 90, MCL 409.101 to 409.124, if applying for a medical first responder license, is 17 years of age or older. If, at the time of the application, the individual described in this subdivision is 17 years of age and less than 18 years of age, the application must be signed by the individual's parent or guardian. (b) Subject to the youth employment standards act, 1978 PA 90, MCL 409.101 to 409.124, if applying for an emergency medical technician license, is 17 years of age or older. If, at the time of the application, the individual described in this subdivision is 17 years of age and less than 18 years of age, the application must be signed by the individual's parent or guardian. (c) If applying for an emergency medical technician specialist, paramedic, or emergency medical services instructor-coordinator license, is 18 years of age or older. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5488 (request no. H00092'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.